Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-142
Legal notices; separate contract rate; authorized.

A public official or other legal notice purchaser who determines it is necessary or for purposes of public information desirable to publish a legal notice using (1) a type size larger than shown in the conversion table in section 33-141, (2) placement of the legal notice in a place more prominent than the regular legal notice portion of the legal newspaper, or (3) a legal newspaper with a paid statewide circulation in excess of one hundred thousand may negotiate with any legal newspaper for a separate contract rate different from the rates set forth in section 33-141 but no higher than the newspaper's lowest scheduled rate for classified advertisements of the type sought to be purchased.

Laws 1989, LB 298, § 2.